Hawaii statutes.
[§353C‑9] Department accreditation
required. The department shall pursue and obtain accreditation for the
sheriff division from the Commission on Accreditation for Law Enforcement
Agencies, Inc. [L 2011, c 111, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next